Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

For contingent expiration of this chapter, see Sec. 8133.003.

CHAPTER 8133. WILLIAMSON COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 16

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8133.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Williamson County Municipal Utility District No. 16.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district in Williamson County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.003. CONFIRMATION ELECTION REQUIRED. If the creation of the district is not confirmed at a confirmation election held under Section 8133.023 before September 1, 2009:

(1) the district is dissolved September 1, 2009, except that:

(A) any debts incurred shall be paid;

(B) any assets that remain after the payment of debts shall be transferred to Williamson County; and

(C) the organization of the district shall be maintained until all debts are paid and remaining assets are transferred; and

(2) this chapter expires September 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.004. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the organization, existence, or validity of the district;

(2) the right of the district to impose taxes; or

(3) the legality or operation of the board.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.005. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, Chapters 30, 49, and 54, Water Code, apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8133.051. DIRECTORS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms that expire June 1 of even-numbered years.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. On the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year, the appropriate number of directors shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8133.101. WASTEWATER TREATMENT FACILITY DESIGN APPROVAL. The district must obtain the approval of the Brazos River Authority for the design of any district wastewater treatment facility.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.102. WASTEWATER SERVICE PROVIDERS. Only the Brazos River Authority or a provider approved by the Brazos River Authority may provide wastewater service in the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 8133.103. COMPLIANCE WITH SEWER SERVICE AGREEMENT. The district shall comply with the terms and conditions of the "Agreement Regarding Sewer Service Areas and Customers by and between Lower Colorado River Authority, Brazos River Authority, City of Georgetown, City of Liberty Hill and Chisholm Trail Special Utility District" dated February 1, 2005.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1332 (H.B. 3548), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.